en: Low calorie ready-to-drink meal replacement
fr: Substitut de repas hypocalorique prêt à boire

en: Low calorie meal replacement in powder reconstituted with skimmed milk
fr: Substitut de repas hypocalorique en poudre reconstituée avec lait écrémé

en: Low calorie milkshake meal replacement in powder reconstituted with skimmed milk
fr: Substitut de repas hypocalorique milk-shake en poudre reconstitué avec lait écrémé

en: Sushi and Maki, Sushis and makis
de: Sushis und Maki-Sushis
es: Sushis y makis
fi: Sushit ja Makit, Sushi ja Maki
fr: Sushis et makis
hr: Sushi i maki
it: Sushi e maki
lt: Sušiai ir makiai
nl: Sushi en maki
pl: Sushi i maki
zh: 寿司和 Maki

en: Sushis
bg: Суши
de: Sushi
es: Sushi
fi: Sushit
fr: Sushis
hr: Sushi
it: Sushi
ja: すし, 寿司, 鮨
lt: Sušiai
nl: Sushis
pl: Sushi
zh: 寿司

en: Frozen sushis
fr: Sushis surgelés

en: Salmon sushis
de: Lachs-Sushis
es: Sushis de salmón
fr: Sushis au saumon
hr: Sushi od lososa
lt: Lašišos sušiai
nl: Zalmsushi
pl: Sushi z łososiem

en: Tuna sushis
de: Thunfisch-Sushi
es: Sushi de atún
fr: Sushis au thon
hr: Sushi od tune
lt: Tunos sušiai
nl: Tonijnsushi
pl: Sushi z tuńczykiem

en: Avocado and salmon sushis
de: Avocado und Lachs Sushis
es: Sushis de aguacate y salmón
fr: Sushis saumon avocat
hr: Sushi od avokada i lososa
lt: Avokado ir lašišos sušiai
pl: Sushi z awokado i łososiem

en: Shrimp sushis
de: Garnelen-Sushi
es: Sushi de camarón
fr: Sushi à la crevette
hr: Sushi od škampa
lt: Krevečių sušiai
pl: Sushi z krewetkami

en: Cucumber sushis
de: Gurken Sushi
es: Sushi de pepino
fr: Sushi au concombre
hr: Sushi od krastavaca
lt: Agurkų sušiai
pl: Sushi z ogórkiem

en: Sushi medley
fr: Assortiments de sushi
hr: Sushi mješavina
nl: Gemengde sushi

en: Makis
de: Maki-Sushi, Maki
es: Makis
fr: Makis
hr: Makis
ja: 巻き寿司
nl: Maki
pl: Maki sushi

en: Californian makis
fr: Makis californiens
hr: Kalifornijski makis
nl: Avocado en zalm sushi

en: Sushi with seafood products, Maki with seafood products
fr: Sushi aux produits de la mer, Maki aux produits de la mer

en: Nigiri sushi
ja: 握り寿司

fr: Chirashi
ja: ちらし寿司

en: Frozen sashimi
fr: Sashimi surgelés

en: Nems, Egg roll, Nem
de: Nems, Nem Rollen
fr: Nems, Nem, Pâté impérial
hr: Nems
nl: Loempias

en: Vegetable nems, Nems with vegetables
de: Gemüse-Nems
es: Nems de verduras
fr: Nems aux légumes
hr: Povrće nems
it: Nems di verdure
nl: Groenteloempias